Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 68.52.155 and 1996 c 324 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Cemetery district elections shall conform with general election laws, except that there shall be no primary to nominate candidates.(2) All persons filing and qualifying shall appear on the general election ballot and the person receiving the largest number of votes for each position shall be elected, except that if only one person files and qualifies as a candidate for a specific commissioner position then that person shall be deemed elected and that commissioner position shall not appear on the ballot.(3) A vacancy on a board of cemetery district commissioners shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.--- END ---